Mississippi, session 2026, HB4137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Robert L. Adams of Washington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Manslaughter in Washington County, on November 20, 2002, for which he was sentenced to serve eight (8) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released to Earned Release Supervision on April 20, 2006, and discharged on May 5, 2007. On April 13, 2010, he was sentenced to twenty (20) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Manslaughter in Washington County. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on February 15, 2019, and discharged on December 14, 2021. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.